Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201590-556
Transfer to General Fund.

The State Treasurer shall transfer $200,000 from the Resource Recovery Fund to the General Fund on or before July 5, 2015.

Laws 2015, LB661, § 15.
May 21, 2015